data/giellatekno/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_soo
+Paradigm/soo_N # ;

LEXICON N_õhsõ
+Paradigm/õhsõ_N # ;

LEXICON N_susi
+Paradigm/susi_N # ;

LEXICON N_sää
+Paradigm/sää_N # ;

LEXICON N_sünti
+Paradigm/sünti_N # ;

LEXICON N_süsiin
+Paradigm/süsiin_N # ;

LEXICON N_süä
+Paradigm/süä_N # ;

LEXICON N_süüčči
+Paradigm/süüčči_N # ;

LEXICON N_vilppi
+Paradigm/vilppi_N # ;

LEXICON N_štanad
+Paradigm/štanad_N # ;

LEXICON N_tauti
+Paradigm/tauti_N # ;

LEXICON N_tee
+Paradigm/tee_N # ;

LEXICON N_terve
+Paradigm/terve_N # ;

LEXICON N_tuhattõ
+Paradigm/tuhattõ_N # ;

LEXICON N_varvõz
+Paradigm/varvõz_N # ;

LEXICON N_täi
+Paradigm/täi_N # ;

LEXICON N_täti
+Paradigm/täti_N # ;

LEXICON N_tükkü
+Paradigm/tükkü_N # ;

LEXICON N_tünke
+Paradigm/tünke_N # ;

LEXICON N_tütär
+Paradigm/tütär_N # ;

LEXICON N_ugurittsõ
+Paradigm/ugurittsõ_N # ;

LEXICON N_usa
+Paradigm/usa_N # ;

LEXICON N_vahti
+Paradigm/vahti_N # ;

LEXICON N_vaka
+Paradigm/vaka_N # ;

LEXICON N_varsi
+Paradigm/varsi_N # ;

LEXICON N_vihtõ
+Paradigm/vihtõ_N # ;

LEXICON N_viki
+Paradigm/viki_N # ;

LEXICON N_vipu
+Paradigm/vipu_N # ;

LEXICON N_või
+Paradigm/või_N # ;

LEXICON N_õgaz
+Paradigm/õgaz_N # ;

LEXICON N_õja
+Paradigm/õja_N # ;

LEXICON N_õma
+Paradigm/õma_N # ;

LEXICON N_õmpõlija
+Paradigm/õmpõlija_N # ;

LEXICON N_õnnõliin
+Paradigm/õnnõliin_N # ;

LEXICON N_õpõin
+Paradigm/õpõin_N # ;

LEXICON N_änte
+Paradigm/änte_N # ;

LEXICON N_ühs
+Paradigm/ühs_N # ;

LEXICON N_üvä
+Paradigm/üvä_N # ;
