data/giellatekno/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
 soo N_soo ;
 sorsõ N_õhsõ ;
 susi N_susi ;
 sää N_sää ;
 sünti N_sünti ;
 süsiin N_süsiin ;
 süä N_süä ;
 süüčči N_süüčči ;
 tauti N_tauti ;
 tee N_tee ;
 terve N_terve ;
 tuhattõ N_tuhattõ ;
 turvõz N_varvõz ;
 täi N_täi ;
 täti N_täti ;
 tükkü N_tükkü ;
 tünke N_tünke ;
 tütär N_tütär ;
 ugurittsõ N_ugurittsõ ;
 usa N_usa ;
 vahti N_vahti ;
 vaka N_vaka ;
 varsi N_varsi ;
 varvõz N_varvõz ;
 vihtõ N_vihtõ ;
 viki N_viki ;
 vilppi N_vilppi ;
 vipu N_vipu ;
 või N_või ;
 änte N_änte ;
 õgaz N_õgaz ;
 õhsõ N_õhsõ ;
 õja N_õja ;
 õma N_õma ;
 õmpõlija N_õmpõlija ;
 õnnõliin N_õnnõliin ;
 õpõin N_õpõin ;
 ühs N_ühs ;
 üvä N_üvä ;
 šlääppi N_vilppi ;
 štanad N_štanad ;
